Alabama, session 2026rs, SB311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. In addition to all other appropriations
heretofore and hereafter made, there is hereby appropriated
$121,000,000 from the Education Trust Fund to the State
Department of Education to be used to provide $1,000,000 to
each school identified as a priority school on the
department's 2024-2025 AAA Priority School List.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on June 1,
2026.

Page 1